District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.05

District of Columbia Board of Elections created.

On or after April 27, 2012, the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics established under subchapter I of Chapter 10 of this title 1 [§ 1-1001.01 et seq.]. shall be known as the District of Columbia Board of Elections and shall have the powers, duties, and functions as provided in that subchapter, in any other law in effect on the date immediately preceding April 27, 2012, and in this subchapter. Any reference in any law or regulation to the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics shall, on and after April 27, 2012, be deemed to refer to the District of Columbia Board of Elections.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 305, 59 DCR 1862
This section is referenced in § 1-1161.01.